Massachusetts, session 194th, H504.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, each
school district in Massachusetts, being required by Massachusetts Law, following the criteria
specifically outlined in and Chapter 71A and regulation 603 CMR 14.09 (1-5), and Chapter 71B,
and regulations 603 CMR 28.07(4) and 603 CMR 28.03 (1)(a)(4), respectively, to support
English Language Learner Parent Advisory Councils and Special Education Parent Advisory
Councils, shall provide an ex-officio, nonvoting seat on the school committee to representatives
from the school district’s ELLPAC and SEPAC, without the right to attend executive sessions
unless such right is expressly granted by the district's school committee.
of 2

The ELLPAC and SEPAC shall elect one representative each from their membership
annually, and in accordance with their bylaws, and shall notify the school committee of their
selection within 30 days of election. Said ELLPAC and SEPAC representatives shall be subject
to all school committee rules and regulations and shall serve without compensation.
of 2